Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 15.066, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06756 15.066 CONFIRMATION OF APPOINTMENTS. Subd. 3. Advice and consent time limit. (a) For appointments that require confirmation by only the senate, if the senate does not reject an appointment within 60 legislative days of the day of receipt of the letter of appointment by the president of the senate, the senate has consented to the appointment. (b) For appointments that require confirmation by both the senate and the house of representatives, if neither the senate nor the house of representatives has rejected an appointment within 60 legislative days of the later of the day of receipt of the letter of appointment by the president of the senate or the day of receipt of the letter of appointment by the speaker of the house of representatives, the house of representatives and senate have consented to the appointment. (c) This section does not apply to appointments to the Campaign Finance and Public Disclosure Board under section 10A.02.